Hawaii statutes.
[§334B-5] Confidentiality. A review
agent may not disclose or publish individual medical or psychological records
or any other confidential medical or psychological information obtained in the
performance of utilization review or managed care activities. [L 1991, c 95, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next